Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-345
Department of Health and Human Services; permanent file; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall prepare and keep on permanent file compilations of the information submitted on the abortion reporting forms and reporting forms regarding attempts at continuing a woman's pregnancy after taking mifepristone pursuant to such rules and regulations as established by the department, which compilations shall be a matter of public record. Under no circumstances shall the compilations of information include the name of any attending physician or identify in any respect facilities where abortions are performed. The department, in order to maintain and keep such compilations current, shall file with such reports any new or amended information.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 60;

Laws 1979, LB 316, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 64;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 30;

Laws 2019, LB209, § 3.